Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.115

Rules and procedures.

(1) The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required by this chapter, including adoption, amendment, or repeal of rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the efficient administration of this chapter.

(2) The secretary of state may adopt rules to facilitate electronic filing. The rules will detail the circumstances under which the electronic filing of documents will be permitted, how the documents will be filed, and how the secretary of state will return filed documents. The rules may also impose additional requirements related to implementation of electronic filing processes, including but not limited to file formats, signature technologies, delivery, and the types of entities, records, or documents permitted.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1104.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.